Arkansas, session 2025, HB1869.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 16, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 26 — Maternal Outcomes Management System

20-16-2601. Legislative intent.
It is the intent of this subchapter to establish a comprehensive
statewide system of care addressing maternal health by organizing resources,
educating providers and patients, incentivizing best practices, and
collecting critical data to drive improvement.

20-16-2602. Maternal Outcomes Management System.
(a) The Department of Health shall create a comprehensive statewide
system of care addressing maternal health to be called the "Maternal Outcomes
Management System".
(b) The Maternal Outcomes Management System shall without limitation:
*JMB578*
04-07-2025 10:25:54 JMB578

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1869
(1)(A) Research and organize maternal health resources.
(B) The Department of Health, in conjunction with other
state agencies as appropriate, shall maintain on the website of the
Department of Health resources pertaining to maternal health including
without limitation information regarding:
(i) Enrollment in the Arkansas Medicaid Program;
(ii) Lactation education;
(iii) Provider access;
(iv) Transportation resources;
(v) Maternal health education; and
(vi) Local community support services;
(2) Provide education to patients and clinicians regarding
maternal health issues;
(3) Incentivize best practices for maternal health through the
grant program described in § 20-16-2603;
(4) In conjunction with the Arkansas Hospital Association, the
Department of Human Services, and the Department of Health, collect data
concerning maternal health from birthing and delivery hospitals to promote
best practices and to identify opportunities for improvement in maternal
health care;
(5) Develop a platform for structured peer review; and
(6) Coordinate care through the continuum of services needed to
ensure the best maternal health outcomes.
(c) The activities of the Maternal Outcomes Management System under
this section and the additional requirements under this subchapter are
contingent upon the availability and appropriation of funding.

20-16-2603. Grants for birthing and delivery hospitals — Designation
system.
(a)(1) As part of the Maternal Outcomes Management System, the
Department of Health shall establish a grant program for birthing and
delivery hospitals that includes a designation system for birthing and
delivery hospitals based on the individual hospital's capability to provide
clinical care for pregnant women.
(2) The department shall:
(A) Accept applications from birthing and delivery
04-07-2025 10:25:54 JMB578

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1869
hospitals to participate in the grant program under subdivision (a)(1) of
this section;
(B) Determine conditions for designation in the grant
program under subdivision (a)(1) of this section; and
(C) Set the time frame for review and renewal of the
applications under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section.
(3) The designation system for birthing and delivery hospitals
described in subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall:
(A) Be in accordance with the levels of maternal care from
the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, as existing on
January 1, 2025; and
(B) Evaluate the capabilities of a hospital to deliver
high-quality maternity care and ensure that all mothers receive the
appropriate level of care.
(4) The birthing and delivery hospitals under subdivision (a)(1)
of this section shall be organized into the appropriate hospital regions to
meet regularly as determined by the department to discuss maternal health
data and to provide a forum for regional peer review and performance feedback
to and from the department and the birthing and delivery hospitals.
(b) To qualify for a grant under the grant program established under
subsection (a) of this section, a birthing and delivery hospital shall meet
requirements set by the department including without limitation:
(1) Community outreach and education;
(2) Clinician education on maternal health;
(3) Peer review of all birthing and delivery complications;
(4) Participation in regional meetings of birthing and delivery
hospitals;
(5) An on-site maternal health coordinator;
(6) Local site visits from inspectors of the department; and
(7) Achievement of certain clinical metrics consistent with
evidence-based practices proven to improve maternal health outcomes.
(c) A grant under this section shall be distributed in a manner that
provides the greatest financial support to birthing and delivery hospitals
with the fewest resources.
(d) The department may promulgate rules to implement this section.

04-07-2025 10:25:54 JMB578

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1869
20-16-2604. MOMS Care Connect — Coordinating call center.
The Department of Health shall establish a call center to be called the
"MOMS Care Connect" to operate in conjunction with the Arkansas Trauma Call
Center and to coordinate transfers of pregnant women between hospitals to
ensure an appropriate level of care is provided.

20-16-2605. Postpartum Support Hotline — Post-delivery call center.
(a)(1) The Department of Health shall establish a call center to be
called the "Postpartum Support Hotline" to proactively reach out to mothers
post-delivery.
(2) The call center established in this section shall be
separate from MOMS Care Connect established under § 20-16-2604.
(3) The department may partner with another state entity or an
institution of higher education to establish the call center established in
this section.
(b) The call center under this section shall screen mothers through a
standardized questionnaire developed by the department to determine which
mothers need follow-up information, including without limitation information
regarding:
(1) The mental well-being of the mother;
(2) Access to follow-up healthcare;
(3) Lactation or feeding concerns;
(4) Healthy sleep for infants; and
(5) Screening for certain medical conditions.
(c) The call center under this section shall provide connections
directly to resources to support mothers identified as needing follow-up
information.

/s/L. Johnson







04-07-2025 10:25:54 JMB578